Vermont, session 2025-2026, H22.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 1 V.S.A. § 317 is amended to read:
§ 317. DEFINITIONS; PUBLIC AGENCY; PUBLIC RECORDS AND
DOCUMENTS; EXEMPTIONS
* * *
(c) The following public records are exempt from public inspection and
copying:
* * *
(7) Personal documents relating to an individual, including information
in any files maintained to hire, evaluate, promote, or discipline any employee
of a public agency; information in any files relating to personal finances; or
medical or psychological facts concerning any individual or corporation;
provided, however, that all information in personnel files of an individual
employee of any public agency shall be made available to that individual
employee or his or her designated representative and information concerning
severance pay or the extension of employment benefits beyond the date of
separation shall be available for public inspection and copying.
* * *
Sec. 2. 1 V.S.A. § 319 is amended to read:
§ 319. ENFORCEMENT
* * *
VT LEG #378732 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.22
2025 Page 3 of 5
(d)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the court
shall assess against the public agency reasonable attorney’s fees and other
litigation costs reasonably incurred in any case under this section in which the
complainant has substantially prevailed.
* * *
(4) The court may, in its discretion, assess against a public agency
punitive damages not to exceed $2,500.00 when the court finds that the agency
has not acted in good faith by improperly withholding or unduly delaying
access to a public record.
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. chapter 15, subchapter 8 is amended to read:
Subchapter 8. Termination Notice Separation; Notice and Severance Records
* * *
§ 1272. SEVERANCE AND BENEFIT EXTENSION AGREEMENTS;
AVAILABILITY FOR PUBLIC INSPECTION AND COPYING
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Benefit extension agreements” means an agreement made between
a State public agency and an employee that confers severance pay or the
extension of an employment benefit beyond the date of separation.
(2) “Public agency” means a “public agency” as defined by 1 V.S.A.
§ 317.
VT LEG #378732 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.22
2025 Page 4 of 5
(b) Benefit extension agreements shall be available for public inspection
and copying pursuant to Vermont’s Public Records Act.
(c) Annually, on or before July 1, every public agency of the State shall
publish an annual report concerning all benefit extension agreements executed
by the public agency during the preceding fiscal year. The annual report shall
contain:
(1) the names and positions of the individuals receiving benefits under a
benefit extension agreement;
(2) the total amount paid to each individual pursuant to a benefit
extension agreement;
(3) a list of the specific employment benefits conferred to each
individual under a benefit extension agreement;
(4) the duration of each benefit extension agreement; and
(5) the reasons for employment termination for each individual who
receives benefits pursuant to a benefit extension agreement.
Sec. 4. REPORTS; BENEFIT EXTENSION AGREEMENTS FOR THE
YEARS 2018 THROUGH 2025
On or before January 15, 2026, each public agency of the State shall publish
a report containing the information required by 32 V.S.A. § 1272(c) for the
years 2018 through 2025.
VT LEG #378732 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.22
2025 Page 5 of 5
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378732 v.1